utilities/dictionaries/eu_EU-Basque.aff
FLAG num
SFX 188 0 letxezkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 letxezkie .
SFX 188 0 letxezkie/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 letxezkiguke .
SFX 188 0 letxezkiguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 letxezkigu .
SFX 188 0 letxezkigu/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 letxezkik .
SFX 188 0 letxezkinake .
SFX 188 0 letxezkinake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 letxezkina/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 letxezkin .
SFX 188 0 letxezkioke .
SFX 188 0 letxezkioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 letxezkio .
SFX 188 0 letxezkio/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 letxezkit .
SFX 188 0 letxezkizueke .
SFX 188 0 letxezkizueke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 letxezkizue .
SFX 188 0 letxezkizue/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 letxezkizuke .
SFX 188 0 letxezkizuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 letxezkizu .
SFX 188 0 letxezkizu/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 letzake .
SFX 188 0 letzake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 letza .
SFX 188 0 letza/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leudeke .
SFX 188 0 leudeke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 leude .
SFX 188 0 leude/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leukakete .
SFX 188 0 leukakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 leukake .
SFX 188 0 leukake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 leukate .
SFX 188 0 leukate/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leuka .
SFX 188 0 leuka/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leuskukete .
SFX 188 0 leuskukete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 leuskuke .
SFX 188 0 leuskuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 leuskute .
SFX 188 0 leuskute/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leusku .
SFX 188 0 leusku/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leusnakete .
SFX 188 0 leusnakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 leusnake .
SFX 188 0 leusnake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 leusnate .
SFX 188 0 leusnate/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leusna .
SFX 188 0 leusna/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leustakete .
SFX 188 0 leustakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 leustake .
SFX 188 0 leustake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 leustate .
SFX 188 0 leustate/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leust .
SFX 188 0 leust/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 leutsakete .
SFX 188 0 leutsakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 leutsake .
SFX 188 0 leutsake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 leutsate .
SFX 188 0 leutsate/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leutsa .
SFX 188 0 leutsa/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leutsekete .
SFX 188 0 leutsekete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 leutseke .
SFX 188 0 leutseke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 leutsete .
SFX 188 0 leutsete/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leutse .
SFX 188 0 leutse/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leutsokete .
SFX 188 0 leutsokete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 leutsoke .
SFX 188 0 leutsoke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 leutsote .
SFX 188 0 leutsote/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leutso .
SFX 188 0 leutso/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leutsuekete .
SFX 188 0 leutsuekete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 leutsueke .
SFX 188 0 leutsueke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 leutsuete .
SFX 188 0 leutsuete/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leutsue .
SFX 188 0 leutsue/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leutsukete .
SFX 188 0 leutsukete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 leutsuke .
SFX 188 0 leutsuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 leutsute .
SFX 188 0 leutsute/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leutsu .
SFX 188 0 leutsu/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leutzake .
SFX 188 0 leutzake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 leutza .
SFX 188 0 leutza/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leuzkakete .
SFX 188 0 leuzkakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 leuzkake .
SFX 188 0 leuzkake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 leuzkate .
SFX 188 0 leuzkate/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 leuzka .
SFX 188 0 leuzka/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lezagukete .
SFX 188 0 lezagukete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 lezaguke .
SFX 188 0 lezaguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lezagute .
SFX 188 0 lezagute/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lezaguzkete .
SFX 188 0 lezaguzkete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 lezaguzke .
SFX 188 0 lezaguzke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lezaguzkite .
SFX 188 0 lezaguzkite/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lezaguzki .
SFX 188 0 lezaguzki/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 lezagu .
SFX 188 0 lezagu/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 lezakete .
SFX 188 0 lezakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 lezake .
SFX 188 0 lezake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lezate .
SFX 188 0 leza .
SFX 188 0 liate .
SFX 188 0 liate/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 liate .
SFX 188 0 liate/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lia/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lia/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lidate .
SFX 188 0 lidate/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lidate .
SFX 188 0 lidate/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lid/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 lid/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 liete .
SFX 188 0 liete/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 liete .
SFX 188 0 liete/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 liezaakete .
SFX 188 0 liezaakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezaake .
SFX 188 0 liezaake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezaate .
SFX 188 0 liezadakete .
SFX 188 0 liezadakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezadake .
SFX 188 0 liezadake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezadate .
SFX 188 0 liezagukete .
SFX 188 0 liezagukete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezaguke .
SFX 188 0 liezaguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezagute .
SFX 188 0 liezagu .
SFX 188 0 liezaiekete .
SFX 188 0 liezaiekete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezaieke .
SFX 188 0 liezaieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezaiete .
SFX 188 0 liezaie .
SFX 188 0 liezaiokete .
SFX 188 0 liezaiokete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezaioke .
SFX 188 0 liezaioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezaiote .
SFX 188 0 liezaio .
SFX 188 0 liezak .
SFX 188 0 liezanakete .
SFX 188 0 liezanakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezanake .
SFX 188 0 liezanake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezanate .
SFX 188 0 liezan .
SFX 188 0 liezat .
SFX 188 0 liezazkiakete .
SFX 188 0 liezazkiakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkiake .
SFX 188 0 liezazkiake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkiate .
SFX 188 0 liezazkidakete .
SFX 188 0 liezazkidakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkidake .
SFX 188 0 liezazkidake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkidate .
SFX 188 0 liezazkiekete .
SFX 188 0 liezazkiekete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkieke .
SFX 188 0 liezazkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkiete .
SFX 188 0 liezazkie .
SFX 188 0 liezazkigukete .
SFX 188 0 liezazkigukete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkiguke .
SFX 188 0 liezazkiguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkigute .
SFX 188 0 liezazkigu .
SFX 188 0 liezazkik .
SFX 188 0 liezazkinakete .
SFX 188 0 liezazkinakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkinake .
SFX 188 0 liezazkinake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkinate .
SFX 188 0 liezazkin .
SFX 188 0 liezazkiokete .
SFX 188 0 liezazkiokete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkioke .
SFX 188 0 liezazkioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkiote .
SFX 188 0 liezazkio .
SFX 188 0 liezazkit .
SFX 188 0 liezazkizuekete .
SFX 188 0 liezazkizuekete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkizueke .
SFX 188 0 liezazkizueke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkizuete .
SFX 188 0 liezazkizue .
SFX 188 0 liezazkizukete .
SFX 188 0 liezazkizukete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkizuke .
SFX 188 0 liezazkizuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezazkizute .
SFX 188 0 liezazkizu .
SFX 188 0 liezazuekete .
SFX 188 0 liezazuekete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezazueke .
SFX 188 0 liezazueke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezazuete .
SFX 188 0 liezazue .
SFX 188 0 liezazukete .
SFX 188 0 liezazukete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liezazuke .
SFX 188 0 liezazuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 liezazute .
SFX 188 0 liezazu .
SFX 188 0 lie .
SFX 188 0 lie/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lie .
SFX 188 0 lie/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 ligute .
SFX 188 0 ligute/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 ligute .
SFX 188 0 ligute/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 ligu .
SFX 188 0 ligu/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 ligu .
SFX 188 0 ligu/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lihardukakete .
SFX 188 0 lihardukakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 lihardukake .
SFX 188 0 lihardukake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihardukate .
SFX 188 0 lihardukate/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 liharduka .
SFX 188 0 liharduka/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lihardukete .
SFX 188 0 lihardukete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 liharduke .
SFX 188 0 liharduke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihardute .
SFX 188 0 lihardute/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lihardu .
SFX 188 0 lihardu/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 lihoake .
SFX 188 0 lihoake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakiake .
SFX 188 0 lihoakiake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakia/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakidake .
SFX 188 0 lihoakidake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakid/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakieke .
SFX 188 0 lihoakieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakie .
SFX 188 0 lihoakie/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakiguke .
SFX 188 0 lihoakiguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakigu .
SFX 188 0 lihoakigu/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakik .
SFX 188 0 lihoakinake .
SFX 188 0 lihoakinake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakina/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakin .
SFX 188 0 lihoakioke .
SFX 188 0 lihoakioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakio .
SFX 188 0 lihoakio/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakit .
SFX 188 0 lihoakizueke .
SFX 188 0 lihoakizueke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakizue .
SFX 188 0 lihoakizue/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakizuke .
SFX 188 0 lihoakizuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihoakizu .
SFX 188 0 lihoakizu/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lihoazke .
SFX 188 0 lihoazke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihoazkiake .
SFX 188 0 lihoazkiake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihoazkia/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 lihoazkidake .
SFX 188 0 lihoazkidake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 lihoazkid/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 lihoazkieke .
SFX 188 0 lihoazkieke/1,398 .
